District of Columbia statutes.
34-2503

Right to alter, amend, or repeal reserved.

Congress reserves the right to alter, amend, or repeal §§ 34-2501 and 34-2502.

May 26, 1900, 31 Stat. 218, ch. 587, § 3
1981 Ed., § 43-1303.
1973 Ed., § 43-1303.